Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 6
COLORADO COMMISSION ON UNIFORM STATE LAWS

2-3-601. Commission on uniform state laws - creation.

There is hereby created the Colorado commission on uniform state laws, referred to in this part 6 as the "commission", which shall consist of six members appointed for terms of two years each and until their successors are appointed and, in addition thereto, any citizen of this state who is elected a life member of the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws.

The six members shall be appointed or reappointed by joint resolution of the general assembly no later than ten days after the convening of the first regular session of the general assembly held in each odd-numbered year. At least two commissioners shall be appointed from the general assembly and at least two commissioners from the public at large. Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made by the committee on legal services for the unexpired term of the vacant office.

The six members of the commission shall be attorneys admitted to practice law in the state of Colorado.

The terms of the two members of the commission appointed after July 18, 1975, shall be effective August 11, 1975; thereafter, the appointment of members to succeeding terms shall be in conformance with subsection (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 143, § 182.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-7-1.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 200, § 1, effective July 18.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 2022, § 1, effective July 14.

2-3-602. Compensation - expenses.

The members of the commission shall receive a per diem of twenty dollars for each day actually spent in the transaction of official business of the commission in the state of Colorado. In addition thereto, each member shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of official duties.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 143, § 182.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-7-2.

2-3-603. Meetings - organization.

The commissioners shall meet at least once a year and shall organize by the election of a chairman who shall hold office for a term of one year and until his successor is elected. The director of the office of legislative legal services shall be ex officio the secretary of the commission, or the director may designate an employee of the office to act as secretary of the commission. The office shall provide assistance to the commissioners who are members of the general assembly in their efforts to enact legislation concerning subjects upon which uniformity may be deemed desirable.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 143, § 182.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-7-3.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 308, § 13, effective May 23.

2-3-603.5. Status of commissioners.

Any citizen elected a life member of the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws pursuant to section 2-3-601 (1) and the person serving as ex officio secretary of the commission in accordance with section 2-3-603 shall have the same status as members of the commission appointed pursuant to section 2-3-601 (1) for purposes of participating in the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws, including, but not limited to:

Having the same voting rights at meetings of said national conference; and

Having the same eligibility to be elected to any office of said national conference.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 31, § 1, effective March 13.

2-3-604. Duties of commissioners.

Each commissioner shall attend the meeting of the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws and, both in and out of such national conference, shall do all in his power to promote uniformity in state laws where uniformity may be deemed desirable and practicable. The commission shall prepare and transmit a report and its recommendations to the general assembly on or before January 1 of each year concerning subjects of legislation upon which uniformity among the states may be deemed desirable and concerning the proceedings and recommendations of the most recent meeting of the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws.

Source:

L. 68:

p. 143, § 182.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-7-4.